District of Columbia statutes.
31-5106

Required policies or certificates; contents; delivery; applications and notices.

(a)

All credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance shall be evidenced by an individual policy or in the case of group insurance by a group policy and individual certificates of insurance.

(b)

Each individual policy or certificate of credit life insurance, each individual policy or certificate of credit accident and health insurance, and each individual policy or certificate of credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance shall, in addition to other requirements of law, set forth the name and home office address of the insurance company, and the identity by name or otherwise of the person insured, the rate or amount of payment, if any, by the debtor separately in connection with credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance, a description of the coverage, including the amount and term thereof (which in the case of group insurance may be by description rather than stated amount and term), any exceptions, limitations, or restrictions, and shall state that the benefits shall be paid to the creditor to reduce or extinguish the unpaid indebtedness and, whenever the amount of insurance may exceed the unpaid indebtedness, that any such excess shall be payable to a beneficiary, other than the creditor, named by the debtor or to his estate.

(c)

Except as hereinafter provided, an individual policy or certificate of insurance shall be delivered to the insured debtor at the time the indebtedness is incurred.

(d)

If a debtor makes a separate payment for credit life or credit accident and health insurance and an individual policy or certificate of insurance is not delivered to the debtor at the time the indebtedness is incurred, a copy of the application for such policy or a notice of proposed insurance shall be delivered at such time to the debtor by the creditor. The copy of the application for or notice of proposed insurance shall be signed by the debtor and shall set forth the identity by name or otherwise of the person insured; the rate or amount of payment by the debtor separately for credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance; and a statement that within 30 days, if the insurance is accepted by the insurance company, there will be delivered to the debtor an individual policy or certificate of insurance containing the name and home office address of the insurance company, and a description of the amount, term, and coverage including any exceptions, limitations, and restrictions. The copy of the application for, or notice of, proposed insurance shall refer exclusively to insurance coverage, and shall be separate and apart from the loan, sale, or other credit statement of account, instrument, or agreement unless the information required by this subsection is prominently set forth in such statement of account, instrument, or agreement. If a debtor does not make a separate payment for credit life or credit accident and health insurance, an application need not be taken or a notice of proposed insurance given. In any case, upon acceptance of the insurance by the insurance company, and within 30 days of the date upon which the term of the insurance commences, the insurance company shall cause the individual policy or certificate of insurance to be delivered to the debtor. Said application or notice of proposed insurance shall state that, upon acceptance by the insurance company, the insurance shall become effective as provided in § 31-5105.

History

Sept. 25, 1962, 76 Stat. 581, Pub. L. 87-686, § 6

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1006.
1973 Ed., § 35-1606.